Utah statutes.
31A-28-217.   Immunity.
(1)  There is no liability on the part of and no cause of action of any nature
shall arise against any member insurer or its agents or employees, the
association or its agents or employees, members of the board of directors, or
the commissioner or his representatives, for any action or omission by them in
effecting this part.
(2)  The state does not waive any defense under this part, including the
defense of governmental immunity.  The state is not liable for any action or
omission of the association, its members, or their respective agents or
employees.  The state is not liable for any failure of the association to
perform its duties or to fulfill its stated purpose under this part.
